Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1304.03
State highways; federal aid; further assent.

The Legislature hereby reaffirms its continuing assent to the federal acts set forth in section 39-1304, and amendments thereto.

Laws 1961, c. 181, § 1, p. 534.